en: Fruit Sauces
fr: Sauces aux fruits
hr: Voćni umaci
lt: Vaisių padažai
nl: Vruchtensauzen

en: Chocolate sauce, Chocolate sauces
de: Schokoladensaucen
fr: Sauce au chocolat, Sauces au chocolat
hr: Čokoladni umak
ja: チョコレートソース
lt: Šokoladiniai padažai, Šokoladinis padažas

en: Light custard cream with vanilla, crème anglaise, creme anglaise
de: Englische Creme
fr: Crèmes anglaises, crèmes anglaise, creme anglaise, Crème anglaise
hr: Svijetla puding krema s vanilijom
lt: Lengvas kremas su vanile
nl: Vanillesauzen

en: Custards and pastry creams, Pastry cream, Custard
bg: Сладкарска сметана
fr: Crème pâtissière
hr: Kreme za kreme i peciva
it: Pasticcino alla crema
ja: カスタードクリーム
lt: Kreminiai ir tešlos kremai, tešlos kremas, kremas
nl: Banketbakkersroom, Banketbakkersromen

en: Sabayon
fr: Sabayon

en: Sauces for fishes, sauces for fish
de: Saucen für Fischgerichte
fr: Sauces pour poissons, Sauces pour poisson
hr: Umaci za ribu
lt: Padažai prie žuvies
nl: Sauzen voor visgerechten

en: Molokhia sauce
fr: Sauce meloukhia

en: Kebab sauces
es: Salsa kebab
fr: Sauces kebab
hr: Umaci za kebab
lt: Padažai kebabams
nl: Kebabsauzen

en: Armorican-style sauce
fr: Sauces armoricaines, Sauce armoricaine, Sauces à l'armoricaine, Sauce à l'armoricaine

en: Honey sauces, Sauces with honey, Honey dressings
fr: Sauces au miel
hr: Umaci od meda
lt: Padažai su medumi, Medaus padažai

en: Honey dill sauces
fr: Sauce à l'aneth au miel
hr: Med umaci od kopra
nl: Dillesauzen

en: Wine sauces
fr: Sauces au vin
hr: Vinske umake
lt: Vyno padažai
nl: Wijnsauzen

en: White wine sauces
fr: Sauces au vin blanc, Sauce au vin blanc
hr: Umaci od bijelog vina
lt: Baltojo vyno padažai
nl: Witte wijnsauzen

en: muscat wine sauce
hr: Umak od muškatnog vina
lt: Muskatų vyno padažai
nl: Muskaatwijnsauzen

en: Red wine sauces
de: Rotweinsaucen
fr: Sauces au vin rouge, Sauce au vin rouge
hr: Umaci od crnog vina
lt: Raudonojo vyno padažai
nl: Rode wijnsauzen

en: Yogurt sauces, Yogurt dressing sauces, Yogurt dressing
fr: Sauces au yaourt, Sauce au yaourt, Sauces dressing au yaourt
hr: Umaci od jogurta
lt: Jogurto padažai
nl: Yoghurtsauzen
pl: Sosy jogurtowe, Sos jogurtowy

en: Blue cheese yogurt dressings
nl: Blauwe kaassauzen

en: Grand veneur sauce, Reduction of red wine with garlic shallots and red currant jelly
fr: Sauce grand veneur

en: Cream sauces with spices
fr: Sauces à la crème aux épices
hr: Umaci od vrhnja sa začinima
lt: Kreminiai padažai su prieskoniais

en: Cream sauces with herbs
fr: Sauces à la crème aux herbes
hr: Umaci od vrhnja sa začinskim biljem
lt: Kreminiai padažai su žolelėmis